lt-LT: Stabdžių montavimo flanšo varžtų išdėstymas: 4 varžtai; 5 varžtai; 6 varžtai; Kitas
el: Διάταξη μπουλονιών φλάντζας στήριξης φρένου: 4 μπουλόνια; 5 μπουλόνια; 6 μπουλόνια; Άλλο
sv: Bultmönster för bromsmonteringsfläns: 4-bult; 5-bult; 6-bult; Övrigt
th: รูปแบบสลักเกลียวของหน้าแปลนติดตั้งเบรก: 4 รู; 5 รู; 6 รู; อื่นๆ
nb: Boltmønster for bremsemonteringsflens: 4-bolt; 5-bolt; 6-bolt; Annet
bg-BG: Модел на разположението на болтовете на монтажния фланец за спирачки: 4 болта; 5 болта; 6 болта; Други
cs: Rozteč šroubů montážní příruby brzdy: 4 šrouby; 5 šroubů; 6 šroubů; Jiné
hu: Fékrögzítő perem furatainak elrendezése: 4 csavaros; 5 csavaros; 6 csavaros; Egyéb
pl: Wzór śrub kołnierza mocowania hamulca: Na 4 śruby; Na 5 śrub; Na 6 śrub; Inne
nl: Rembevestigingsflens boutpatroon: 4-bouts; 5-bouts; 6-bouts; Overig
de: Schraubenmuster des Brembefestigungsflansches: 4-Loch; 5-Loch; 6-Loch; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vzorec prirobničnih vijakov za pritrditev zavore: 4 vijaki; 5 vijakov; 6 vijakov; Drugo
it: schema di foratura della flangia di montaggio del freno: 4 bulloni; 5 bulloni; 6 bulloni; Altro
pt-PT: Padrão de furação do flange de montagem do travão: 4 parafusos; 5 parafusos; 6 parafusos; Outro
en: Brake mounting flange bolt pattern: 4 bolt; 5 bolt; 6 bolt; Other
zh-TW: 煞車安裝法蘭螺栓孔位: 4 螺栓; 5 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 其他
ro-RO: Modelul șuruburilor flanșei de montare a frânei: 4 șuruburi; 5 șuruburi; 6 șuruburi; Altele
sk-SK: Rozloženie skrutiek na upevňovacej prírube bŕzd: 4 skrutky; 5 skrutiek; 6 skrutiek; Iný
es: Patrón de pernos de la brida de montaje del freno: 4 tornillos; 5 tornillos; 6 tornillos; Otro
tr: Fren montaj flanşı cıvata deseni: 4 cıvatalı; 5 cıvatalı; 6 cıvatalı; Diğer
da: Boltmønster for bremsemonteringsflange: 4 bolte; 5 bolte; 6 bolte; Andet
vi: Kiểu lỗ bu lông mặt bích lắp phanh: 4 bu-lông; 5 bu-lông; 6 bu-lông; Khác
ko: 브레이크 마운팅 플랜지 볼트 패턴: 4볼트; 5볼트; 6볼트; 기타
ja: ブレーキ取り付けフランジボルトパターン: 4ボルト; 5ボルト; 6ボルト; その他
hr-HR: Raspored vijaka prirubnice za montažu kočnice: 4 vijka; 5 vijaka; 6 vijaka; Ostalo
pt-BR: Padrão de fixação dos parafusos do flange de montagem do freio: 4 parafusos; 5 parafusos; 6 parafusos; Outro
fr: Entraxe des boulons de la bride de montage du frein: 4 boulons; 5 boulons; 6 boulons; Autre
zh-CN: 制动安装法兰螺栓孔布局: 4 螺栓; 5 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 其他
ru: Расположение отверстий для болтов монтажного фланца тормоза: 4 болта; 5 болтов; 6 болтов; Другое
fi: Jarrun kiinnityslaipan pulttijako: 4-pulttinen; 5-pulttinen; 6-pulttinen; Muu